California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) (1) For purposes of this section, satisfactory completion of an informal program of supervision or another term of probation described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to have occurred if the person has no new findings of wardship or conviction for a felony offense or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude during the period of supervision or probation and if the person has not failed to substantially comply with the reasonable orders of supervision or probation that are within their
 capacity to perform. The period of supervision or probation shall not be extended solely for the purpose of deferring or delaying eligibility for dismissal of the petition and sealing of the records under this section.

(2) An unfulfilled order or condition of restitution, including a restitution fine that can be converted to a civil judgment under Section 730.6 or an unpaid restitution fee shall not be deemed to constitute unsatisfactory completion of supervision or probation under this section.

(d) A court shall not seal a record or dismiss a petition pursuant to this section if the petition was sustained based on the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed when the individual was 14 years of age or older unless the finding on that
 offense was dismissed or was reduced to a misdemeanor or to a lesser offense that is not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(e) If a person who has been alleged to be a ward of the juvenile court has their petition dismissed by the court, whether on the motion of the prosecution or on the court’s own motion, or if the petition is not sustained by the court after an adjudication hearing, the court shall order sealed all records pertaining to the dismissed petition in the custody of the juvenile court, and in the custody of law enforcement agencies, the probation department, or the Department of Justice. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency and official named in the order, direct the agency or official to seal its records, and specify a date by which the sealed records shall be destroyed. Each agency and official
 named in the order shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, shall advise the court of its compliance, and, after advising the court, shall seal the copy of the court’s order that was received. The court shall also provide notice to the person and the person’s counsel that it has ordered the petition dismissed and the records sealed in the case. The notice shall include an advisement of the person’s right to nondisclosure of the arrest and proceedings, as specified in subdivision (b).

(f) (1) The court may, in making its order to seal the record and dismiss the instant petition pursuant to this section, include an order to seal a record relating to, or to dismiss, any prior petition or petitions that have been filed or sustained against the individual and that appear to the satisfaction of the court
 to meet the sealing and dismissal criteria otherwise described in this section.

(2) An individual who has a record that is eligible to be sealed under this section may ask the court to order the sealing of a record pertaining to the case that is in the custody of a public agency other than a law enforcement agency, the probation department, or the Department of Justice, and the court may grant the request and order that the public agency record be sealed if the court determines that sealing the additional record will promote the successful reentry and rehabilitation of the individual.

(g) (1) A record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized only under any of the following circumstances:

(A) By the prosecuting attorney, the probation department, or the court for the limited purpose of determining whether the minor is eligible and suitable for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to Section 790 or is ineligible for a program of supervision as defined in Section 654.3.

(B) By the court for the limited purpose of verifying the prior jurisdictional status of a ward who is petitioning the court to resume its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388.

(C) If a new petition has been filed against the minor for a felony offense, by the probation department for the limited purpose of identifying the minor’s previous court-ordered programs or placements, and in that event solely to determine the
 individual’s eligibility or suitability for remedial programs or services. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to other agencies or individuals, except as necessary to implement a referral to a remedial program or service, and shall not be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions upon the minor.

(D) Upon a subsequent adjudication of a minor whose record has been sealed under this section and a finding that the minor is a person described by Section 602 based on the commission of a felony offense, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, or the court for the limited purpose of determining an appropriate juvenile court disposition. Access, inspection, or use of a sealed record as provided under this subparagraph shall not be
 construed as a reversal or modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the prior case.

(E) Upon the prosecuting attorney’s motion, made in accordance with Section 707, to initiate court proceedings to determine whether the case should be transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, or the court for the limited purpose of evaluating and determining if such a transfer is appropriate. Access, inspection, or use of a sealed record as provided under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a reversal or modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the prior case.

(F) By the person whose record has been sealed, upon their request
 and petition to the court to permit inspection of the records.

(G) By the probation department of any county to access the records for the limited purpose of meeting federal Title IV-B and Title IV-E compliance.

(H) The child welfare agency of a county responsible for the supervision and placement of a minor or nonminor dependent may access a record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section for the limited purpose of determining an appropriate placement or service that has been ordered for the minor or nonminor dependent by the court. The information contained in the sealed record and accessed by the child welfare worker or agency under this subparagraph may be shared with the court but shall in all other respects remain confidential and shall not be disseminated
 to any other person or agency. Access to the sealed record under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the case.

(I) By the prosecuting attorney for the evaluation of charges and prosecution of offenses pursuant to Section 29820 of the Penal Code.

(J) By the Department of Justice for the purpose of determining if the person is suitable to purchase, own, or possess a firearm, consistent with Section 29820 of the Penal Code.

(K) (i) A record that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to
 disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation. A request to access information in the sealed record for this purpose, including the prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed, shall be submitted by the prosecuting attorney to the juvenile court. The juvenile court shall notify the person having the sealed record, including the person’s attorney of record, that the court is considering the prosecutor’s request to access the record, and the court shall provide that person with the opportunity to respond, in writing or by appearance, to the request prior to making its determination. The juvenile court shall
 review the case file and records that have been referenced by the prosecutor as necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and any response submitted by the person having the sealed record. The court shall approve the prosecutor’s request to the extent that the court has, upon review of the relevant records, determined that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed record information in order to protect the confidentiality of the person whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this subparagraph. A ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information
 is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding. This subparagraph does not impose any discovery obligations on a prosecuting attorney that do not already exist.

(ii) This subparagraph shall not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(L) If a new petition has been filed against the minor in juvenile court and the issue of competency is raised, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, and the court for the purpose of assessing the minor’s competency in the proceedings on the new petition. Access, inspection, or utilization of the sealed records is limited to any prior competency evaluations submitted to the court, whether ordered by the court or not,
 all reports concerning remediation efforts and success, all court findings and orders relating to the minor’s competency, and any other evidence submitted to the court for consideration in determining the minor’s competency, including, but not limited to, school records and other test results. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to any other person or agency except as necessary to evaluate the minor’s competency or provide remediation services, and shall not be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions on the minor. Access to the sealed record under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the case.

(M) A record that was sealed pursuant to this section that was generated in
 connection with the investigation, prosecution, or adjudication of a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 679.10 of the Penal Code may be accessed by a judge or prosecutor for the limited purpose of processing a request of a victim or victim’s family member to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to other agencies or individuals, except as necessary to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration, and under no circumstances shall it be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions upon an individual.

(2) When a record has been sealed by the court based on a dismissed
 petition pursuant to subdivision (e), the prosecutor, within six months of the date of dismissal, may petition the court to access, inspect, or utilize the sealed record for the limited purpose of refiling the dismissed petition based on new circumstances, including, but not limited to, new evidence or witness availability. The court shall determine whether the new circumstances alleged by the prosecutor provide sufficient justification for accessing, inspecting, or utilizing the sealed record in order to refile the dismissed petition.

(3) Access to, or inspection of, a sealed record authorized by paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not be deemed an unsealing of the record and shall not require notice to any other agency.

(h) (1) This section does not prohibit a court from
 enforcing a civil judgment for an unfulfilled order of restitution ordered pursuant to Section 730.6. A minor is not relieved from the obligation to pay victim restitution, restitution fines, and court-ordered fines and fees because the minor’s records are sealed.

(2) A victim or a local collection program may continue to enforce victim restitution orders, restitution fines, and court-ordered fines and fees after a record is sealed. The juvenile court shall have access to records sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purpose of enforcing a civil judgment or restitution order.

(i) This section does not prohibit the State Department of Social Services from meeting its obligations to monitor and conduct periodic evaluations of, and provide reports on, the programs carried
 under federal Title IV-B and Title IV-E as required by Sections 622, 629 et seq., and 671(a)(7) and (22) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as implemented by federal regulation and state statute.

(j) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court, and shall make available appropriate forms, providing for the standardized implementation of this section by the juvenile courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 74.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

786.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the probation department shall seal the citation, arrest, and other records in its custody relating to a juvenile’s arrest and referral and participation in a diversion or supervision program under both of the following circumstances:

(1) Upon satisfactory completion of a program of diversion or supervision to which a juvenile is referred by the probation officer in lieu of the filing of a petition to adjudge the juvenile a ward of the juvenile court, including a program of informal supervision pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Upon satisfactory completion of a program of diversion or supervision to which a juvenile is referred by the prosecutor in lieu of the filing of a petition to adjudge the juvenile a ward of the juvenile court, including a program of informal supervision pursuant to Section 654.

(b) The probation department shall notify the citing or arresting law enforcement agency and the Department of Justice to seal the citation or arrest records described in
 subdivisions (a) and (g), and the citing or arresting law enforcement agency and the Department of Justice shall seal the records in their custody relating to the arrest no later than 60 days from the date of notification by the probation department. Upon sealing, the citing or arresting law enforcement agency and the Department of Justice shall notify the probation department that the records have been sealed. Within 30 days from receipt of notification
 by the
 citing or
 arresting law enforcement agency and the Department of Justice that the records have been sealed pursuant to this section, the probation department shall notify the minor in writing that their record has been sealed pursuant to this section. If records have not been sealed pursuant to this section, the written notice from the probation department shall inform the minor of their ability to petition the court directly to seal their citation, arrest, and other related records.

(c) Upon sealing of the records pursuant to
 this section, the arrest or offense giving rise to any of the circumstances specified in subdivision (a) shall be deemed not to have occurred and the individual may respond accordingly to any inquiry, application, or process in which disclosure of this information is requested or sought.

(d) (1) For the records relating to the circumstances described in subdivision (a), the probation department shall issue notice as follows:

(A) The probation department shall notify a public or private agency operating a diversion program to which the juvenile has been referred under these circumstances to seal records in the program operator’s custody relating to the arrest or referral and the participation of the juvenile in the diversion or supervision program, and the operator of the program shall seal the records in its custody relating to the juvenile’s arrest or
 referral and participation in the program no later than 60 days from the date of notification by the probation department. Upon sealing, the public or private agency operating a diversion program shall notify the probation department that the records have been sealed.

(B) The probation department shall notify the participant in the supervision or diversion program in writing that their record has been sealed pursuant to the provisions of this section based on their satisfactory completion of the program. If the record is not sealed, the probation department shall notify the participant in writing of the reason or reasons for not sealing the record.

(2) An individual who receives notice from the probation department that the individual has not satisfactorily completed the diversion program and that the record has not been sealed pursuant to this section may petition the juvenile
 court for review of the decision in a hearing in which the program participant may seek to demonstrate, and the court may determine, that the individual has met the satisfactory completion requirement and is eligible for the sealing of the record by the probation department, the arresting law enforcement agency, and the program operator under the provisions of this section.

(e) Satisfactory completion of the program of supervision or diversion shall be defined for purposes of this section as substantial compliance by the participant with the reasonable terms of program participation that are within the capacity of the participant to perform. A determination of satisfactory or unsatisfactory completion shall be made by the probation department within 60 days of completion of the program by the juvenile, or, if the juvenile does not complete the program, within 60 days of determining that the program has not been completed by the juvenile.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the probation department of a county responsible for the supervision of a person may access a record sealed by a probation department pursuant to this section for the sole purpose of complying with subdivision (e) of Section 654.3. The information contained in the sealed record and accessed by the probation department under this paragraph shall in all other respects remain confidential and shall not be disseminated to any other person or agency. Access to, or inspection of, a sealed record authorized by this paragraph shall not be deemed an unsealing of the record and shall not require notice to any other agency.

(2) (A) Any record, that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional
 obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation.

(B) (i) A prosecuting attorney shall not use information contained in a record sealed pursuant to this section for any purpose other than those provided in subparagraph (A).

(ii) Once the case referenced in subparagraph (A) has been closed and is no longer subject to review on appeal, the prosecuting attorney shall destroy any records obtained pursuant to this subparagraph.

(g) The probation department, the Department of Justice, and law enforcement agencies shall seal the citation, arrest, and
 other records in their custody relating to a juvenile’s citation, arrest, and detention if the prosecutor has declined to initiate proceedings within the applicable statute of limitations, and notified the probation department of that decision. Upon notification of the prosecutor’s decision, the probation department shall seal the citation, arrest, and other records in its custody and proceed pursuant to subdivision (b). This subdivision shall not affect any other applicable remedies for sealing of juvenile case files.

(h) If the probation department deems it unnecessary to refer the juvenile to a program of diversion or supervision, or elects to counsel the juvenile and take no further action, the probation department shall seal the citation, arrest, and other records in its custody and proceed pursuant to subdivision (b). In any case that was referred to the prosecuting attorney and the prosecuting attorney notifies the probation officer that
 it has declined to file a petition, the probation department shall seal the arrest and other records in its custody relating to the juvenile’s arrest and proceed according to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 1877)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

787.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a record sealed pursuant to Section 781, 786, 786.5, or 788 may be accessed by a law enforcement agency, probation department, court, the Department of Justice, or other state or local agency that has custody of the sealed record for the limited purpose of complying with data collection or data reporting requirements that are imposed by other provisions of law. However, no personally identifying information from a sealed record accessed under this subdivision may be released, disseminated, or published by or through an agency, department, court, or individual that has accessed or obtained information from the sealed record.

(b) Notwithstanding any other
 law, a court may authorize a researcher or research organization to access information contained in records that have been sealed pursuant to Section 781, 786, 786.5, or 788 for the purpose of conducting research on juvenile justice populations, practices, policies, or trends, if both of the following are true:

(1) The court is satisfied that the research project or study includes a methodology for the appropriate protection of the confidentiality of an individual whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Personally identifying information relating to the individual whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this subdivision is not further released, disseminated, or published by or through the researcher or research organization.

(c) For the purposes of this section “personally identifying information” has the same meaning as in Section 1798.79.8 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 811, Sec. 3.   (AB 1877)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

788.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 781, of this code or Section 1203.47 of the Penal Code, if a petition has been filed with a juvenile court to commence proceedings to adjudge a person a ward of the court, the county probation officer shall do either of the following once the person has reached 18 years of age:

(1) If the person will not remain under the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction, the county probation officer shall petition the court to seal the records relating to the person’s case that are in the custody of the juvenile court, probation officer, law enforcement agency, or any other private or public agency. The probation officer shall provide a copy of the petition to the minor and
 their counsel at least 30 days prior to filing the petition.

(2) If the person will remain under the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction, the county probation officer shall petition the court as specified in paragraph (1) no later than one year after the termination of the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction.

(b) All of the following shall not be sealed pursuant to this section:

(1) A person’s juvenile court records relating to a case that was transferred from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction under Section 707.1 if the person was convicted in the court of criminal jurisdiction.

(2) A person’s juvenile court records relating to an offense
 listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed when the person was 14 years of age or older, unless that offense was dismissed or reduced to a misdemeanor or a lesser offense that is not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(3) A person’s juvenile court records relating to an offense for which the person is required to register pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code.

(c) If the court finds that the person has not been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude after the juvenile court’s jurisdiction was terminated, it shall order sealed all records, papers, and exhibits in the person’s case that are in the custody of the juvenile court, law enforcement agency, probation department, Department of Justice, or any other private or
 public agency, including the juvenile court record, minute book entries, docket entries, and arrest records. The person’s defense counsel shall not be ordered to seal their records. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency named in the order. Each agency shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, send a notice to the court that it has complied with the order, and seal the copy of the court’s order the agency received.

(d) If the court has ordered the person’s records sealed, the proceedings of the sealed case shall be deemed never to have occurred and the person may properly reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events.

(e) When the probation officer does not file a petition pursuant to this section, the probation officer shall notify, in
 writing, the person and their counsel of the reason for not filing the petition.

(f) (1) A record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized only under any of the following circumstances:

(A) If the person who is the subject of the sealed records petitions the court to permit inspection of the records and the court grants inspection.

(B) By the court for the limited purpose of verifying the prior jurisdictional status of a ward who is petitioning the court to resume its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388.

(C) (i) By the prosecuting attorney in
 order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation. The prosecuting attorney shall submit a request to the juvenile court to access information in the sealed record for this purpose. The request shall include the
 prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed. The juvenile court shall notify the subject of the sealed records and their attorney of the prosecutor’s request and provide them with the opportunity to respond, in writing or by appearance, to the request. The court shall approve the prosecutor’s request if, upon review of the relevant records, it determines that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed records in order to protect the confidentiality of the subject
 of the sealed records. A court ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding.

(ii) This subparagraph does not impose any additional discovery obligations on a prosecuting attorney.

(iii) This subparagraph does not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(2) Access to, or inspection of, a sealed record authorized by this subdivision is not considered an unsealing of the record and does not require notice to any other agency.

(g) (1) This section does
 not apply to records in the custody of the Department of Motor Vehicles relating to a conviction for an offense under the Vehicle Code or any local ordinance relating to the operation, stopping and standing, or parking of a vehicle if the record of the conviction would be a public record under Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code. However, if a court orders the record containing this conviction to be sealed under this section, and the department maintains a public record of the conviction, the court shall notify the department of the sealing.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department is notified by the court of a sealing pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall allow access to its record of conviction only to the subject of the record and to insurers that have been granted requestor code numbers by the department. An insurer
 that has been given access to a record of conviction shall be given notice of the sealing when the record is disclosed. The insurer may use the information contained in the record for purposes of determining eligibility for insurance and insurance rates for the subject of the record. The insurer shall not use the information for any other purpose and shall not disclose it to any other person or agency.

(h) A petition for sealing shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.

(i) (1) This section does not prohibit a court from enforcing a civil judgment for an unfulfilled order of restitution obtained pursuant to Section 730.6. A person is not relieved from the obligation to pay victim restitution, a restitution fine, or a
 court-ordered fine because their records are sealed.

(2) The juvenile court shall have access to any records sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purpose of enforcing a civil judgment or restitution order.

(j) A court shall not grant relief under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the petition for sealing. The probation officer shall notify the prosecuting attorney when a petition is filed. If the prosecuting attorney fails to appear or object to the petition after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney shall not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that petition.

(k) Unless the court determines there is good cause to retain the juvenile court
 record, the court shall order the destruction of a person’s juvenile court records that are sealed pursuant to this section.

(1) If the subject of the record was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601, the court shall order the destruction five years after the record was ordered sealed.

(2) If the subject of the record was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 602, the court shall order the destruction when the subject reaches 38 years of age. If the subject was found to be a person described in Section 602 because of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 and was 14 years of age or older at the time of the offense, the records shall not be destroyed.

(3) The court shall order any other agency in possession of sealed records to destroy its records five years after the records were ordered sealed.

(l) The relief provided in this section does not preclude any other relief provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 75.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20.5. Deferred Entry of Judgment [790. - 795.]

790.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 654 or 654.2, or any other provision of law, this article shall apply whenever a case is before the juvenile court for a determination of whether a minor is a person described in Section 602 because of the commission of a felony offense, if all of the following circumstances apply:

(1) The minor has not previously been declared to be a ward of the court for the commission of a felony offense.

(2) The offense charged is not one of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(3) The minor has not previously been committed to the
 custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of
 Juvenile Facilities.

(4) The minor’s record does not indicate that probation has ever been revoked without being completed.

(5) The minor is at least 14 years of age at the time of the hearing.

(6) The minor is eligible for probation pursuant to Section 1203.06 of the Penal Code.

(7) The offense charged is not rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or an act of sexual penetration specified in Section 289 of the Penal Code when the victim was prevented from resisting due to being rendered unconscious by any intoxicating, anesthetizing, or controlled substance, or when the victim was at the time incapable, because of mental disorder or developmental
 or physical disability, of giving consent, and that was known or reasonably should have been known to the minor at the time of the offense.

(b) The prosecuting attorney shall review their file to determine whether or not paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) apply. If the minor is found eligible for deferred entry of judgment, the prosecuting attorney shall file a declaration in writing with the court or state for the record the grounds upon which the determination is based, and shall make this information available to the minor and their attorney. Upon a finding that the minor is also suitable for deferred entry of judgment and would benefit from education, treatment, and rehabilitation efforts, the court may grant deferred entry of judgment. Under this procedure, the court may set the hearing for deferred entry of judgment at
 the initial appearance under Section 657. The court shall make findings on the record that a minor is appropriate for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to this article in any case where deferred entry of judgment is granted.

(c) (1) If a minor is eligible for deferred entry of judgment, but the minor resides in a different county and the case will be transferred, as described in Section 750, the court may adjudicate the case without determining the minor’s suitability for deferred entry of judgment to enable the court in the minor’s county of residence to make that determination.

(2) If a minor is eligible for deferred entry of judgment, but the court did not determine the minor’s suitability for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to paragraph (1), upon
 transfer of the case to the minor’s county of residence, the receiving court may, prior to determining the disposition of the case, determine the minor’s suitability for deferred entry of judgment and modify the transferring court’s finding accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 603, Sec. 2.   (SB 383)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: This section was added on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

791.

(a) The prosecuting attorney’s written notification to the minor shall also include all of the following:

(1) A full description of the procedures for deferred entry of judgment.

(2) A general explanation of the roles and authorities of the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, the program, and the court in that process.

(3) A clear statement that, in lieu of jurisdictional and disposition hearings, the court may grant a deferred entry of judgment with respect to any offense charged in the petition, provided that the minor
 admits each allegation contained in the petition and waives time for the pronouncement of judgment, and that upon the successful completion of the terms of probation, as defined in Section 794, the positive recommendation of the probation department, and the motion of the prosecuting attorney, but no sooner that 12 months and no later than 36 months from the date of the minor’s referral to the program, the court shall dismiss the charge or charges against the minor.

(4) A clear statement that upon any failure of the minor to comply with the terms of probation, including the rules of any program the minor is directed to attend, or any circumstances specified in Section 793, the prosecuting attorney or the probation department, or the court on its own, may make a motion to the court for entry of judgment and the court shall render a finding that
 the minor is a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602 for the offenses specified in the original petition and shall schedule a dispositional hearing.

(5) An explanation of record retention and disposition resulting from participation in the deferred entry of judgment program and the minor’s rights relative to answering questions about their arrest and deferred entry of judgment following successful completion of the program.

(b) If the minor consents and waives their right to a speedy jurisdictional hearing, the court may refer the case to the probation department or the court may summarily grant deferred entry of judgment if the minor admits the charges in the petition and waives time for the pronouncement of judgment. When directed by the court, the probation department
 shall make an investigation and take into consideration the defendant’s age, maturity, educational background, family relationships, demonstrable motivation, treatment history, if any, and other mitigating and aggravating factors in determining whether the minor is a person who would be benefited by education, treatment, or rehabilitation. The probation department shall also determine which programs would accept the minor. The probation department shall report its findings and recommendations to the court. The court shall make the final determination regarding education, treatment, and rehabilitation of the minor.

(c) If a minor is eligible for deferred entry of judgment, but the court did not determine the minor’s suitability for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 790, when the case is
 transferred, the receiving court may, prior to determining the disposition of the case, order the probation department to make an investigation and report pursuant to subdivision (b) to determine the minor’s suitability for deferred entry of judgment.

(d) A minor’s admission of the charges contained in the petition pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a finding that a petition has been sustained for any purpose, unless a judgment is entered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 793.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 603, Sec. 3.   (SB 383)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

792.
